New Mexico, session 2026, HB205.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF NEW MEXICO: SECTION 1. [NEW MATERIAL] CAREER TECHNICAL EXTERNSHIP PROGRAM--CREATED.--The "career technical externship program" is created as a professional development program in the workforce solutions department. The program shall pair career technical teachers in public schools and career technical faculty at public community colleges with various industry representatives of high-skill, in-demand and emerging professions and occupations to enhance teachers' technical skills and their understanding of changing standards, procedures and workforce needs in traditional or rapidly advancing career technical fields. The workforce solutions department shall collaborate with the public education department and career technical faculty at public community colleges to design the externship program and the process for applying for an externship, including qualifications, review and selection of extern candidates. SECTION 2. APPROPRIATION.--Two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000) is appropriated from the general fund to the workforce solutions department for expenditure in fiscal year 2027 to implement and administer the career technical externship program. Any unexpended balance remaining at the end of fiscal year 2027 shall revert to the general fund. - 2 -